Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.030

Statement to indeterminate sentence review board.

At the time the convicted person is transported to the custody of the department of corrections, the indeterminate sentence review board shall obtain from the sentencing judge and the prosecuting attorney, a statement of all the facts concerning the convicted person's crime and any other information of which they may be possessed relative to him or her, and the sentencing judge and the prosecuting attorney shall furnish the board with such information. The sentencing judge and prosecuting attorney shall indicate to the board, for its guidance, what, in their judgment, should be the duration of the convicted person's imprisonment.

[ 2011 c 336 s 338; 1999 c 143 s 17; 1984 c 114 s 2; 1955 c 133 s 4. Prior: 1947 c 92 s 1, part; 1935 c 114 s 2, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 10249-2, part.]